South Dakota, session 2026, HB1150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $4,000,000 from the general fund and $4,000,000 in federal
fund expenditure authority, to the Department of Social Services, for increasing the rate of
payment for services, as described in § 28-6-1, to the extent available with the moneys and
authority appropriated for federally qualified health centers, as defined in 42 C.F.R.
§ 405.2401 (November 5, 2025).
Section 2. The secretary of the Department of Social Services shall approve vouchers and
the state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 3. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 4. This Act is effective beginning June 30, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.